Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2416
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-2416 to 54-2438 shall be known and may be cited as the Livestock Waste Management Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 822, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 619, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2003, § 54-2401;

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 1.